Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2734.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-207, to read: START_STATUTE23-207. Dependent care assistance program; employer mandate All employers in this state shall offer to its employees a dependent care assistance program as described in 26 United States Code section 129. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2027.